Idaho, session 2025, H0278.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 1-2220, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-2220. RETENTION OR NONRETENTION OF MAGISTRATE BY VOTE. Any magis-
trate appointed pursuant to the provisions of section 1-2205, Idaho Code,
and section 1-2207(2), Idaho Code, shall stand for office in the first gen-
eral election next succeeding the expiration of the eighteen (18) month
period established pursuant to section 1-2207, Idaho Code. Any magistrate
may, not less than ninety (90) days prior to the holding of the general elec-
tion next preceding the expiration of his term of office, during the time
period provided in section 34-1404, Idaho Code, file in the office of the
county clerk of the county for which he is a resident magistrate, accompa-
nied by a filing fee of forty dollars ($40.00), a declaration of candidacy
to succeed himself. If a declaration is not so filed by any magistrate, the
vacancy resulting from the expiration of his term of office shall be filled
by appointment as herein provided, except that any magistrate who does not
file shall be ineligible for appointment within the same judicial district
until for two (2) years following the expiration of his last term of office
have expired. If such a declaration is filed, his name shall be submitted at
the next general election to the voters eligible to vote within the county
for which he is appointed, on a nonpartisan judicial ballot, without party
designation, which shall read:
"Shall Magistrate .... (Here insert the name of the magistrate) of
.... (Here insert the name of the county) County of the .... (Here
insert the judicial district number) Judicial District be retained
in office?" (Here provision is to be made for voting "Yes" or "No.")
"No".)
The votes shall be canvassed as provided in chapter 12, title 34, Idaho
Code.
If a majority of those voting on the question vote against retaining him
in office, upon the expiration of his term of office, a vacancy shall exist
which shall be filled by appointment as provided in section 1-2205, Idaho


Code, except that the magistrate not retained in office shall be ineligi-
ble for appointment within the same judicial district until for two (2) years
following the expiration of his last term of office have expired.
If a majority of those voting on the question vote for retaining him in
office, the county clerk shall issue him a certificate of election as pro-
vided in section 34-1209, Idaho Code, and said magistrate shall, unless re-
moved for cause, remain in office for an additional term of four (4) years,
and at the expiration of each such four (4) year term shall be eligible for
retention in office by election in the manner herein prescribed.
SECTION 2. That Section 31-4306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-4306. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. (1) An election of directors shall be
held in each district on the Tuesday succeeding the first Monday of November
of each odd-numbered year. Such election shall be held in conformity with
title 34, Idaho Code. Before the notice of election is given, the board shall
divide the district into subdivisions as nearly equal in population as pos-
sible to be designated as director's subdistrict 1, 2 and 3, or director's
subdistrict 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5, depending upon on the number of subdistricts
in the district. Each nominating petition shall state the subdistrict for
which the nominee is nominated.
(2) In any election for directors if, after the expiration of the date
for filing written nominations for the office of director, it appears that
only one (1) qualified candidate has been nominated for each position to be
filled and if no declaration of intent has been filed as provided in subsec-
tion (3) of this section, it shall not be necessary to hold an election, and
the board of directors shall, no later than seven (7) days before the sched-
uled date of the election, declare such candidate elected as director, and
the secretary of the recreation district board shall immediately make and
deliver to such person a certificate of election.
(3) No write-in vote for recreation district director shall be counted
unless a declaration of intent has been filed indicating that the person
desires the office and is legally qualified to assume the duties of recre-
ation district director if elected. The declaration of intent shall be filed
with the recreation district board secretary not later than forty-five (45)
days before the day of election during the time period provided in section
34-1407, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 33-2705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2705. CONDUCT OF ELECTION. Upon the county commissioners having
made the order referred to in subsection (5) of section 33-2704, Idaho Code,
the clerk of the board of county commissioners shall cause to be published a
notice of an election to be held for the purpose of determining whether or not
the proposed library district shall be established under the provisions of
this chapter. The date of this election shall be the next uniform election
date as provided for in section 34-106, Idaho Code. Whenever more than one
(1) petition is presented to the county commissioners calling for an elec-
tion to create library districts, the first presented shall take precedence.


Notice of the election shall be given, the election shall be conducted, and
the returns thereof canvassed as provided for in chapter 14, title 34, Idaho
Code, and under the general election laws of the state of Idaho. The ballot
shall contain the words "(Name) Library District--Yes" and "(Name) Library
District--No,"No", each followed by a box wherein the voter may express his
choice by marking a cross "X." "X". The board or boards of election shall
make returns and certify the results to the boards of county commissioners
within three (3) days after the election, and the board of county commission-
ers shall, within seven (7) days after the election, canvass the returns.
If a majority of all votes cast be in the affirmative, the board of county
commissioners shall, within seven (7) nine (9) days after the returns have
been canvassed, enter an order declaring the library district established,
designating its name and boundaries including a map prepared in a draftsman-
like manner. The board of county commissioners shall transmit a copy of the
order to the county recorder, county assessor, and the state tax commission
in a timely manner, but no later than December 15, in the calendar year in
which the election was held. A copy of the order shall also be transmitted to
the board of library commissioners.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-2717A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2717A. DECLARATION OF INTENT FOR WRITE-IN CANDIDATE. No write-in
vote for library district trustee in a library district election shall be
counted unless a declaration of intent has been filed indicating that the
person desires the office and is legally qualified to assume the duties of
library trustee if elected. The declaration of intent shall be filed with
the clerk of the library board not later than forty-five (45) days before the
day of election during the time period provided in section 34-1407, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 34-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-106. LIMITATION UPON ON ELECTIONS. On and after January 1, 2011,
notwithstanding any other provisions of the law to the contrary, there shall
be no more than two (2) elections conducted in any county in any calendar
year, except as provided in this section or section 34-220, Idaho Code, and
except that elections to fill vacancies in the United States house of repre-
sentatives shall be held as provided in the governor's proclamation.
(1) The dates on which elections may be conducted are:
(a) The third Tuesday in May of each year; and
(b) The Tuesday following the first Monday in November of each year.
(c) In addition to the elections specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection and subsection (7) of this section, an emergency elec-
tion may be called upon motion of the governing board of a political sub-
division. An emergency exists when there is a great public calamity,
such as an extraordinary fire, flood, storm, epidemic, or other disas-
ter, or when it is necessary to do emergency work to prepare for national
or local defense or to safeguard life, health or property.


(2) Candidates for office elected in May shall take office on the date
specified in the certificate of election but not more than sixty (60) days
following the election.
(3) Candidates for office elected in November shall take office as pro-
vided in the constitution or on January 1 next succeeding the November elec-
tion.
(4) The governing board of each political subdivision subject to the
provisions of this section that, prior to January 1, 2011, conducted an elec-
tion for members of that governing board on a date other than a date permit-
ted in subsection (1) of this section shall establish as the election date
for that political subdivision the date authorized in subsection (1) of this
section that falls nearest the date on which elections were previously con-
ducted, unless another date is established by law.
(5) The secretary of state is authorized to provide such assistance as
necessary and to prescribe any needed rules or interpretations for the con-
duct of an election authorized under the provisions of this section.
(6) Water districts governed by chapter 6, title 42, Idaho Code, are ex-
empt from the provisions of this section.
(7) Community colleges governed by chapter 21, title 33, Idaho Code,
and school districts are subject to the limitations specified in subsection
(1) of this section.
(8) A city initiative or referendum election shall be held on the Tues-
day following the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years. A county
initiative or referendum election or a bond, levy and any or other ballot
question elections election conducted by any political subdivision shall be
held on the nearest date authorized in subsection (1) of this section that
falls more than sixty (60) days after the clerk of the political subdivision
orders that such election shall be held in May or November of even-numbered
years or more than fifty (50) days after the order for all other elections,
unless otherwise provided by law. Ballot as long as the ballot language for
any question to be placed on the ballot shall be is submitted to the county
clerk at least sixty (60) days before an election held in May or November of
even-numbered years and at least fifty (50) days before all other elections
no later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Friday before the election.
(9) Recall elections may be held on any of the three (3) dates autho-
rized in subsections (1) and (7) subsection (1) of this section that fall
more than forty-five (45) days after the clerk of the political subdivision
orders that such election shall be held as long as the recall petition is cer-
tified no later than the tenth Friday before the next scheduled election.
(10) Irrigation districts governed by title 43, Idaho Code, are subject
to the limitations specified in subsection (1) of this section, except that
irrigation districts may also hold an election on the first Tuesday in Febru-
ary of each year and on the first Tuesday in August of each year on questions
required to be voted upon on by title 43, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. That Section 34-408, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-408. CLOSING OF REGISTER -- TIME LIMIT. (1) No elector may regis-
ter in the office of the county clerk within twenty-four (24) days preced-
ing after 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh day before any election held through-


out the county in which he resides for the purpose of voting at such elec-
tion; provided however, a legible, accurate and complete registration ap-
plication received in the office of the county clerk during the twenty-four
(24) eleven (11) day period preceding an election shall be accepted and held
by the county clerk until the day following the election when registration
reopens, at which time the registration shall become effective. This dead-
line shall also apply to any registrars the county clerk may have appointed.
(2) Any elector who will complete his residence requirement or attain
the requisite voting age during the period when the register of electors is
closed may register prior to the closing of the register.
(3) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, an individual who
is eligible to vote may also register, upon completing a registration ap-
plication and showing proof of identity and residence pursuant to section
34-411, Idaho Code, at the absent electors' polling place provided in sec-
tion 34-1006, Idaho Code, or at an early voting station provided in section
34-1012, Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. That Section 34-410, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-410. MAIL REGISTRATION. (1) Any elector may register by mail for
any election. Any mail registration application must be received by the
county clerk prior to the close of registration as provided in section
34-408, Idaho Code, provided that any mail registration application post-
marked not later than twenty-five (25) days prior to an election shall be
deemed timely.
(2) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for the mail regis-
tration application.
(3) The mail application form shall be available for distribution
through governmental and private entities, with particular emphasis on mak-
ing them available for organized voter registration programs.
(4) Any federal mail registration form adopted pursuant to the provi-
sions of the national voter registration act of 1993, (P.L. 103-31), shall
also be accepted as a valid registration, if such form is postmarked not
later than twenty-five (25) days prior to an election it is received no later
than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh day before the election.
(5) The county clerk shall prepare and issue by first class nonforward-
able mail to each elector registering by mail a verification of registration
containing the name and residence of the elector and the name or number of the
precinct in which the elector resides. A verification returned undeliver-
able shall cause the county clerk to remove the elector's card from the reg-
ister of electors.
(6) As required by the help America vote act of 2002, (P.L. 107-252), a
copy of proper identification will be required prior to issuance of a ballot
to anyone who has registered by mail and has not previously voted in an elec-
tion for federal office in the state. Proper identification shall meet the
requirements of section 34-411(3) and (4), Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. That Section 34-625, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


34-625. ELECTION OF HIGHWAY DISTRICT COMMISSIONERS IN SINGLE COUNTY-
WIDE DISTRICTS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) In each general election, highway dis-
trict commissioners in single countywide districts shall be elected as pro-
vided for in section 40-1404, Idaho Code.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of highway district commis-
sioner unless he shall have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the
time of his election, is a citizen of the United States, and shall be a res-
ident of the highway district commissioner's subdistrict for which he seeks
office.
(3) Each candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk not less than ninety (90) days prior to the general election
during the time period provided in section 34-1404, Idaho Code. Each dec-
laration of candidacy shall also bear the following words: "I am a resident
within the boundaries of Highway District Commissioner's Subdistrict Number
....."
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund.
SECTION 9. That Section 34-625A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-625A. ELECTION OF HIGHWAY DISTRICT COMMISSIONERS IN CERTAIN SINGLE
COUNTYWIDE DISTRICTS -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) In each general election, high-
way district commissioners in single countywide districts shall be elected
as provided for in section 40-1404A, Idaho Code.
(2) No person shall be elected to the office of highway district commis-
sioner unless he shall have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the
time of his election, is a citizen of the United States, and shall be a res-
ident of the highway district commissioner's subdistrict for which he seeks
office.
(3) Each candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy with the
county clerk not less than ninety (90) days prior to the general election
during the time period provided in section 34-1404, Idaho Code. Each dec-
laration of candidacy shall also bear the following words: "I am a resident
within the boundaries of Highway District Commissioner's Subdistrict Number
....."
(4) Each candidate who files a declaration of candidacy shall at the
same time pay a filing fee of ten dollars ($10.00) which shall be deposited in
the county current expense fund.
SECTION 10. That Section 34-702A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-702A. DECLARATION OF INTENT FOR WRITE-IN CANDIDATES. (1) No
write-in vote for any office in a primary, special, or general election
shall be counted unless a completed declaration of intent form has been filed
indicating that the person desires the office and is legally qualified to
assume the duties of said office if elected. The declaration of intent shall
be filed with the secretary of state if for a federal, state, or legislative
district office and with the county clerk if for a county or party precinct


committeeman office. Such declaration of intent shall be filed no later than
the ninth Friday before the day of election.
(2) The declaration of intent for write-in candidates for federal,
state, or legislative district offices shall be filed with the secretary
of state no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh Friday before the primary
election.
(3) The declaration of intent for write-in candidates for county or
party precinct committeeman office shall be filed with the county clerk no
later than 5:00 p.m. on the ninth Friday before the primary election.
(4) For a write-in candidate for president, the declaration shall in-
clude a certification of the write-in candidate's vice presidential and
presidential electors, all of whom must be qualified to serve in their re-
spective offices. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for said
declarations.
(2) (5) In those counties that utilize optical scan ballots, an elector
shall not place on the ballot a sticker bearing the name of a person or use any
other method or device, except writing, to vote for a person whose name is not
printed on the ballot.
SECTION 11. That Section 34-704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-704. DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY. (1) Any person legally qualified to
hold such office is entitled to become a candidate and file his a declara-
tion of candidacy. Each political party candidate for precinct, state, dis-
trict or county office shall file his declaration of candidacy in the proper
office between 8:00 a.m. on the twelfth Monday preceding the primary elec-
tion and 5:00 p.m. on the tenth Friday preceding the primary election. All
political party candidates shall declare their party affiliation in their
declaration of candidacy and shall be affiliated with a party at the time of
filing. A candidate shall be deemed affiliated with the political party if
the candidate submits a party affiliation form along with the declaration of
candidacy to the appropriate filing official. The filing official shall re-
ject any declaration of candidacy for partisan office in a primary election
from candidates who are not affiliated with a political party. Candidates
for nonpartisan office shall file during the period provided for in this sec-
tion.
(2) Each political party candidate for federal, state, or legislative
district office shall file a declaration of candidacy with the secretary of
state's office between 8:00 a.m. on the thirteenth Monday before the primary
election and 5:00 p.m. on the twelfth Friday before the primary election.
(3) Each political party candidate for county or precinct committeeman
office shall file a declaration of candidacy with the county clerk's office
between 8:00 a.m. on the twelfth Monday before the primary election and 5:00
p.m. on the tenth Friday before the primary election.
(2) (4) Candidates who file a declaration of candidacy under a party
name and are not nominated at the primary election shall not be allowed to ap-
pear on the general election ballot under any other political party name, nor
or as an independent candidate.
(3) (5) Independent candidates shall file their declaration of candi-
dacy in the manner provided in section 34-708, Idaho Code.


(4) (6) All information in declarations of candidacy shall be made pub-
licly available upon request, except that the Idaho residential street ad-
dress and telephone number of a judicial officer may be exempt from disclo-
sure pursuant to sections 19-6202 and 74-106(30), Idaho Code.
SECTION 12. That Section 34-705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-705. WITH WHOM DECLARATIONS FILED. (1) All candidates for county
offices, whether political party candidates or independent candidates, and
all political party candidates for precinct offices shall file their decla-
rations of candidacy with the county clerk of their respective counties. All
candidates for district, state and federal offices shall file their declara-
tions of candidacy with the secretary of state.
(2) The secretary of state shall certify to the county clerks, within
ten (10) days after the filing deadline no later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth
Friday before the primary election, the names of the political party candi-
dates who filed for federal, state, and legislative district offices and are
qualified for placement on the ballot.
(3) The secretary of state shall certify the name of a candidate being
appointed by the appropriate central committee pursuant to section 34-714,
Idaho Code, by no later than the next business day after the appointment is
received in the secretary of state's office, if received after the certifi-
cation of candidates to the county clerks under subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 13. That Section 34-712, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-712. SAMPLE FORM FOR PRIMARY ELECTION BALLOTS. The secretary of
state shall provide the sample form of the primary election ballot to each of
the county clerks no later than forty (40) days prior to the primary no later
than the ninth Friday before the primary election. The sample ballot shall
contain the proper political party candidates to be voted upon on within
the county whose declarations were filed and certified in the office of the
secretary of state with instructions for the placing of political party
candidates seeking the political party nomination for county and precinct
offices. If a county is within more than one (1) legislative district, the
secretary of state shall provide a sample ballot for each legislative dis-
trict which that includes part of the county.
SECTION 14. That Section 34-714, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-714. FILLING VACANCIES IN SLATE OF POLITICAL PARTY CANDIDATES OC-
CURRING PRIOR TO PRIMARY ELECTION. (1) Vacancies that occur before the pri-
mary election in the slate of candidates of any political party because of
the death, disqualification for any reason, or withdrawal from the nomina-
tion process by the candidate, shall be filled in the following manner if
there is only one (1) candidate declared for that particular office:


(a) By the county central committee if the vacancy occurs for the office
of precinct committeeman or for a county office.
(b) By the legislative district central committee if the vacancy occurs
for the office of state representative or state senator.
(c) By the state central committee if the vacancy occurs for a federal
or state office.
The county and legislative district central committee shall fill the
vacancy within fifteen (15) days from the date the vacancy occurred. The
state central committee shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days from
the date the vacancy occurred, but no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth
Friday before the primary election.
Any political party candidate so appointed by the proper central com-
mittee must, in order to have his name on the primary ballot, file a declara-
tion of candidacy and pay the required filing fee no later than 5:00 p.m. on
the eighth Friday before the primary election.
(2) No central committee shall fill any vacancy which that occurs
within ten (10) days prior to after 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Friday before the
primary election. Vacancies which that occur during this ten (10) day pe-
riod after this date because of the death, disqualification for any reason,
or withdrawal from the nomination process by the candidate shall be filled
according to the provisions of section 34-715, Idaho Code.
(3) Vacancies that occur in a slate of candidates for precinct commit-
teeman within ten (10) days prior to after 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Friday be-
fore the primary election shall not be filled.
SECTION 15. That Section 34-715, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-715. FILLING OF VACANCIES OCCURRING BEFORE OR AFTER PRIMARY ELEC-
TION. (1) Vacancies that occur during the ten (10) day period after 5:00 p.m.
on the eighth Friday before a primary election, or after the primary election
but at least ten (10) days before 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Friday before the
general election in the slate of candidates of any political party because
of the death or disqualification for any reason of a candidate, except can-
didates for precinct committeeman, shall be filled in the following manner
if there is only one (1) candidate declared from the political party for that
particular office:
(1) (a) By the county central committee if it is a vacancy by a candidate
for a county office.
(2) (b) By the legislative district central committee if it is a vacancy
by a candidate for the state legislature.
(3) (c) By the state central committee if it is a vacancy by a candidate
for a federal or a state office.
(d) If the party candidate for a particular office dies or is disquali-
fied after 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Friday before the general election,
such candidate's name shall remain on the ballot. If the deceased or
disqualified candidate wins the general election, the resulting va-
cancy shall be filled pursuant to chapter 9, title 59, Idaho Code.
(2) The county and legislative district central committee shall fill
the vacancy within fifteen (15) days from the date the vacancy occurred. The
state central committee shall fill the vacancy within thirty (30) days from


the date the vacancy occurred, but no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Fri-
day before the general election.
(3) Any political party candidate so appointed by the proper central
committee must, in order to have his name on the general ballot, file a dec-
laration of candidacy and pay the required filing fee no later than 5:00 p.m.
on the eighth Friday before the general election.
(4) Vacancies that occur in a slate of candidates for precinct commit-
teeman within ten (10) days prior to after 5:00 p.m. on the eighth Friday be-
fore the primary election shall not be filled.
SECTION 16. That Section 34-717, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-717. WITHDRAWAL OF CANDIDACY. (1) A candidate for nomination or
candidate for election to a partisan office may withdraw from the election
by filing a notarized statement of withdrawal with the officer with whom his
declaration of candidacy was filed. The statement must contain all informa-
tion necessary to identify the candidate and the office sought and the reason
for withdrawal. The filing officer shall immediately notify the proper
central committee of the party, if any, of the individual withdrawing. A
candidate may not withdraw later than forty-five (45) days before an elec-
tion, except in the case of a primary election, when the deadline shall be
no later than the eighth Friday preceding the primary election, or a general
election, when the deadline shall be no later than September 7. Filing fees
paid by the candidate shall not be refunded.
(2) A candidate for federal, state, or legislative district office may
not withdraw later than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh Friday before a primary
election or 5:00 p.m. on the ninth Friday before a general election. Filing
fees paid by the candidate shall not be refunded.
(3) A candidate for county or precinct committeeman office may not
withdraw later than 5:00 p.m. on the ninth Friday before any election. Fil-
ing fees paid by the candidate shall not be refunded.
(2) (4) Any candidate who has filed a statement of withdrawal pursuant
to this section shall not be allowed to be appointed to fill a vacancy unless
such vacancy occurs because of the death of a previous candidate.
SECTION 17. That Section 34-1012, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1012. ALTERNATIVE PROCEDURES FOR ABSENTEE VOTING -- EARLY VOT-
ING. (1) Those counties that utilize absentee voting facilities that have
access to the Idaho statewide voter registration system and count ballots at
a central location or utilize a polling location-based tabulation system may
elect to conduct "early voting" according to the provisions of this section.
For those counties that elect to do "early voting," early voting shall begin
on or before after the third fourth Monday before the election and end at 5:00
p.m. on the Friday before the election. Primary election ballots shall be
issued pursuant to section 34-1002(2), Idaho Code.
(2) A voter who appears at an "early voting" station to vote shall state
his or her name and address to the election official and present the voter's
identification as required by sections 34-1113 and 34-1114, Idaho Code.


(3) The election official shall examine the records to ascertain
whether or not such applicant is registered and lawfully entitled to vote
as requested. The provisions of section 34-408A, Idaho Code, authorizing
election day registration shall also apply in determining the applicant's
qualifications to vote.
(4) Before receiving a ballot, each elector shall sign his or her name
in the election register and poll book provided for early voting.
(5) The elector shall then be given the appropriate ballots contain-
ing the official election ballot identification pursuant to section 34-901,
Idaho Code, and shall be given folding instructions for such ballots, if ap-
propriate.
(6) Upon receipt of the ballots, the elector shall retire to a vacant
voting booth and mark the ballots according to the instructions provided.
(7) After marking the ballot, the elector shall present himself or her-
self to the election official at the ballot box and state his or her name and
address. The elector shall then deposit the ballot in the ballot box or hand
it to the election official, who shall deposit it. The election official
shall then record that the elector has voted and proclaim the same in an audi-
ble voice.
(8) Voters requiring assistance shall be provided with such assistance
in accordance with section 34-1108, Idaho Code.
(9) Electioneering is prohibited at an early voting polling place as
provided in section 18-2318, Idaho Code.
SECTION 18. That Section 34-1205, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1205. COUNTY BOARD OF CANVASSERS -- MEETINGS. The county board of
commissioners shall be the county board of canvassers and the county clerk
shall serve as their its secretary for this purpose. The county board of can-
vassers shall meet within seven (7) nine (9) days after a primary election
and within ten (10) days after a general an election for the purpose of can-
vassing the election returns of all precincts within the county.
SECTION 19. That Section 34-1404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1404. DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY. (1) Candidates for election in any
political subdivision shall be nominated by nominating petitions, each of
which shall bear the name of the nominee, the office for which the nomina-
tion is made, the term for which nomination is made, and the signature of not
less than five (5) electors of the candidate's specific zone or district of
the political subdivision, and shall be filed with the clerk of the political
subdivision.
(2) The form of the nominating petition shall be as provided by the
county clerk and shall be uniform for all political subdivisions.
(3) For an election to be held on the third Tuesday in May, in even-
numbered years, the The nomination petition shall be filed during the pe-
riod specified in section 34-704, Idaho Code beginning at 8:00 a.m. on the
twelfth Monday before the election and no later than 5:00 p.m. on the tenth
Friday before such election. The clerk of the political subdivision shall


notify the county clerk within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the fil-
ing and verify the qualifications of the nominees and shall, no more than
seven (7) days after the close of filing, certify the nominees to be placed
on the ballot of the political subdivision. For an election to be held on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday of November, in even-numbered years,
the nomination shall be filed on or before September 1. The clerk of the
political subdivision shall verify the qualifications of the nominees and
shall, no more than seven (7) days after the close of filing, certify the nom-
inees to be placed on the ballot of the political subdivisions. For all other
elections, the nomination shall be filed not later than 5:00 p.m. on the
ninth Friday preceding the election for which the nomination is made. The
clerk of the political subdivision shall verify the qualifications of the
nominee and shall, no more than seven (7) days following the filing, certify
the nominees to be placed on the ballot of the political subdivision.
(2) (4) Nominating petitions shall include campaign contact informa-
tion for candidates, including phone numbers and email addresses.
(3) (5) All information in nominating petitions shall be made publicly
available upon request.
SECTION 20. That Section 34-1405A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
34-1405A. WITHDRAWAL OF CANDIDACY. A candidate for nomination or can-
didate for election to an office may withdraw from the election by filing a
notarized statement of withdrawal with the officer with whom his declaration
of candidacy was filed. The statement must contain all information neces-
sary to identify the candidate and the office sought and the reason for with-
drawal. A candidate may not withdraw later than forty-six (46) days 5:00
p.m. on the ninth Friday before an election.
SECTION 21. That Section 34-1407, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
34-1407. WRITE-IN CANDIDATES. (1) No write-in candidate for any non-
partisan elective office shall be counted unless a declaration of intent has
been filed indicating that the person desires the office and is legally qual-
ified to assume the duties of the office. The declaration of intent shall be
filed with the clerk of the political subdivision by no later than 5:00 p.m.
on the eighth ninth Friday before the date of the election.
(2) If the statutes governing elections within a specific political
subdivision provide that no election shall be held in the event that no
more than one (1) candidate has filed for an office, that statute shall be
interpreted in such a manner as to allow for filing a declaration of intent
for a write-in candidate until the eighth Friday preceding 5:00 p.m. on the
ninth Friday before the election. However, if no candidate has filed within
that time, no election shall be held for that political subdivision. The
provisions of this section shall not apply to federal, state, or legislative
district candidates in the primary or general election covered by the provi-
sions of section 34-702A, Idaho Code.


SECTION 22. That Section 40-1305C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
40-1305C. DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY -- QUALIFICATIONS. (1) Candidates
for election as a highway district commissioner shall be nominated by nomi-
nating petitions, each of which shall bear the name of the nominee, the sub-
district for which the nomination is made, the term for which nomination is
made, bear the signature of not no less than five (5) electors of the can-
didate's specific subdistrict, and be filed with the election official of
the highway district. The form of the nominating petition shall be as pro-
vided by the county clerk. The nomination shall be filed not later than 5:00
p.m. on the sixth Friday preceding the election for which the nomination is
made. The election official shall during the time period provided in section
34-1404, Idaho Code. The clerk of the political subdivision shall notify
the county clerk within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the filing and
verify the qualifications of the nominee, and shall not, no more than seven
(7) days following the filing, shall certify the nominees to be placed on the
ballot.
(2) A nominee shall qualify for the office of highway district commis-
sioner if such nominee:
(a) Has attained the age of twenty-one (21) years at the time of his
election; and
(b) Is a citizen of the United States; and
(c) Is a resident of the highway district commissioner's subdistrict
for which he seeks office.
SECTION 23. That Section 42-3211a, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 24. That Section 50-407, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-407. FORM OF DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY. Declarations of candidacy
and petitions of candidacy shall read substantially as herein set forth. Any
number of separate petitions of candidacy may be circulated at the same time
for any candidate and all petitions for each candidate shall be considered
one (1) petition when filed with the city clerk. Each signer of a petition
shall be a registered qualified elector.
DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY
I, the undersigned, affirm that I am a qualified elector of the City of
........., State of Idaho, and that I have resided in the city for at least
thirty (30) days. I hereby declare myself to be a candidate for the office
of ............., for a term of .... years, to be voted for at the election
to be held on the .... day of ....., ...., and certify that I possess the
legal qualifications to fill said office, and that my residence address is
...............
(Signed) ........................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this .... day of ........, .....


................................
Notary Public
State of Idaho
County of ........ ss.
City of ..........
PETITION OF CANDIDACY
OF ..................................................................
(NAME OF CANDIDATE)
FOR OFFICE OF ........................................................
This petition must be filed in the office of the City Clerk not no ear-
lier than 8:00 a.m. on the eleventh twelfth Monday nor and no later than
5:00 p.m. on the ninth tenth Friday immediately preceding before election
day. The submitted petition must have affixed thereto the names of at least
five (5) qualified electors who reside within the appropriate city.
I, the undersigned, being a qualified elector of the City of
.............., in the State of Idaho, do hereby certify and declare that I
reside at the place set opposite my name and that I do hereby join in the pe-
tition of .............., a candidate for the office of .................
to be voted at the election to be held on the .... day of........., .....
Signature of Petitioner Printed Name Residence Address Date Signed
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
..................... ............ ................. ...........
STATE OF IDAHO
County of ....................


I, ......................, being first duly sworn, say: That I am a
resident of the State of Idaho and at least eighteen (18) years of age; that
every person who signed this sheet of the foregoing petition signed his or
her name thereto in my presence; I believe that each has stated his or her
name and residence address correctly; and that each signer is a qualified
elector of the State of Idaho, and the City of ....................
Signed ...........................
Address ..........................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ...... day of ......., .....
Signed Notary Public ...............................
Residing at ........................................
Commission expires .................................
(Notary Seal)
SECTION 25. That Section 50-410, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-410. TIME AND MANNER OF FILING DECLARATIONS. (1) All declarations
of candidacy for elective city offices shall be filed with the clerk of the
respective city wherein the elections are to be held not earlier than 8:00
a.m. on the eleventh Monday nor later than 5:00 p.m. on the ninth Friday,
immediately preceding election day during the time period provided in sec-
tion 34-1404, Idaho Code. Before a candidate files a petition of candidacy
with the city clerk, the petition signatures shall be verified by the county
clerk in the manner described in section 34-1807, Idaho Code, except that the
city clerk shall stand in place of the secretary of state. Before any dec-
laration of candidacy and filing fee or petition of candidacy mentioned in
section 50-407, Idaho Code, can be filed, the city clerk shall ascertain that
it conforms to the provisions of chapter 4, title 50, Idaho Code. The city
clerk shall not accept any declarations of candidacy after 5:00 p.m. on the
ninth Friday immediately preceding election day. Write-in candidates shall
be governed by section 34-702A 34-1407, Idaho Code, but shall file the decla-
rations required in that section with the city clerk.
(2) A person shall not be permitted to file a declaration of candidacy
for more than one (1) office in any city election.
SECTION 26. That Section 67-4911, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-4911. ELECTIONS -- TERMS OF OFFICE. (1) On an election date as pro-
vided for in section 34-106(1), Idaho Code, in May of the first odd-numbered
year after the organization of any district, and every second year there-
after, an election shall be held, which shall be known as the biennial elec-
tion of the district.
(2) At the first biennial election in any district hereafter organized,
and each sixth year thereafter, there shall be elected by the qualified elec-
tors of the district, one (1) member of the board to serve for a term of six
(6) years; at the second biennial election and each sixth year thereafter,


there shall be elected two (2) members of the board to serve for terms of six
(6) years, and at the third biennial election, and each sixth year there-
after, there shall be elected two (2) members of the board to serve for terms
of six (6) years. Provided, a member of the board once in office shall serve
until his successor is elected, qualified and takes office.
(3) Not later than 5:00 p.m. on the ninth Friday before any such elec-
tion, nominations may be filed with the secretary of the board. Nominations
may be filed during the time period provided in section 34-1404, Idaho Code.
The county clerk shall provide for holding such election and shall appoint
judges to conduct it. The county clerk shall give notice of election by pub-
lication, and shall arrange such other details in connection therewith. Ad-
equate polling places shall be provided throughout the district boundaries
for all elections.
(4) The returns of the election shall be certified to and shall be
canvassed and declared by the board of county commissioners which shall
report the results to the district. The candidate or candidates, according
to the number of directors to be elected, receiving the most votes, shall
be elected. Any new member of the board shall qualify in the same manner as
members of the first board qualify.
(5) In any election for director, if after the deadline for filing a
declaration of intent as a write-in candidate, it appears that the number of
qualified candidates who have been nominated is equal to the number of di-
rectors to be elected, it shall not be necessary for the candidates to stand
for election, and the board shall declare such candidates elected as direc-
tors, and the secretary of the board shall immediately make and deliver to
such persons certificates of election signed by him and bearing the seal of
the district.
SECTION 27. That Section 70-1108, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
70-1108. DISTRICT FORMATION. Within five (5) nine (9) days after such
election the board of county commissioners shall canvass the returns; and,
if at such election a majority of the voters voting upon on such proposition
shall vote in favor of the formation of such district, the board of county
commissioners shall so declare in its canvass of the returns of such elec-
tion, and such port district shall thereupon be and become a municipal corpo-
ration of the state of Idaho and the name of each port district shall be "Port
of ...." (inserting the name appearing on the ballot).
SECTION 28. That Section 19-6203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6203. ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY -- ELIGIBILITY. (1) Judicial offi-
cers desiring that their Idaho residential street address and telephone num-
ber and the Idaho residential street address and telephone number of their
residing household members be exempt from disclosure pursuant to this chap-
ter and sections 34-704(4) 34-704(6) and 74-106(30), Idaho Code, may submit
an application and a fee, if any, to the custodian of the public record that
contains such information. Upon receipt of such application and fee, the
public agency shall comply with the provisions of this chapter for a period


of four (4) years. Thereafter, judicial officers may renew the exemption by
submitting a new application and fee, if any. The public agency may estab-
lish a fee schedule not to exceed the actual cost to the agency of complying
with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Judicial officers may submit an application to a public agency
requesting that the public agency use an alternative Idaho mailing address
rather than the Idaho residential street address of any such officer and of
any such officer's residing household members on all applications and on
all identification cards, licenses, certificates, permits, tags, and other
similar documents that are issued to the officer or to such officer's resid-
ing household members by the public agency. A public agency receiving such
application shall comply with the request.
(3) A person shall cease to be eligible for an exemption under this
chapter if such person ceases to be a judicial officer or a residing house-
hold member. Within thirty (30) days of such cessation, the person shall
notify, in writing, every public agency to which the person has made an ap-
plication stating that he is no longer eligible for such exemption. If a
judicial officer changes employment but is still eligible for an exemption
under this chapter, such judicial officer shall, within thirty (30) days
of changing employment, submit a new application to every public agency to
which such officer has made an application.
(4) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a public agency from obtain-
ing the Idaho residential street address and telephone number of a judicial
officer and of any residing household member. A judicial officer who has
submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall
provide his current Idaho residential street address to his employing en-
tity. The judicial officer's employing entity, or any public agency that has
obtained the Idaho residential street address of a judicial officer, shall
upon request identify the county in which the judicial officer's Idaho resi-
dential street address is situated.
SECTION 29. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.